Illinois, session 104th, HB2746.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Community 5Partner Fair Contracting Act. 6    Section 5. The State Comptroller Act is amended by 7changing Sections 9 and 9.03 as follows: 8    (15 ILCS 405/9)  (from Ch. 15, par. 209)9    Sec. 9. Warrants; vouchers; preaudit. 10    (a) No payment may be made from public funds held by the 11State Treasurer in or outside of the State treasury, except by 12warrant drawn by the Comptroller and presented by him to the 13treasurer to be countersigned except for payments made 14pursuant to Section 9.03 or 9.05 of this Act.15    (b) No warrant for the payment of money by the State 16Treasurer may be drawn by the Comptroller without the 17presentation of itemized vouchers indicating that the 18obligation or expenditure is pursuant to law and authorized, 19and authorizing the Comptroller to order payment.20    (b-1) An itemized voucher for under $5 that is presented 21to the Comptroller for payment may be paid through electronic 22funds transfer unless the recipient is unable to receive an   HB2746- 2 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1electronic funds transfer or requests another form of payment. 2This subsection (b-1) does not apply to (i) vouchers presented 3by the legislative branch of State government, (ii) vouchers 4presented by the State Treasurer's Office for the payment of 5unclaimed property claims authorized under the Revised Uniform 6Unclaimed Property Act, or (iii) vouchers presented by the 7Department of Revenue for the payment of refunds of taxes 8administered by the Department. 9    (c) The Comptroller shall examine each voucher required by 10law to be filed with him and determine whether unencumbered 11appropriations or unencumbered obligational or expenditure 12authority other than by appropriation are legally available to 13incur the obligation or to make the expenditure of public 14funds. If he determines that unencumbered appropriations or 15other obligational or expenditure authority are not available 16from which to incur the obligation or make the expenditure, 17the Comptroller shall refuse to draw a warrant.18    (d) The Comptroller shall examine each voucher and all 19other documentation required to accompany the voucher, and 20shall ascertain whether the voucher and documentation meet all 21requirements established by or pursuant to law. If the 22Comptroller determines that the voucher and documentation do 23not meet applicable requirements established by or pursuant to 24law, he shall refuse to draw a warrant. As used in this 25Section, "requirements established by or pursuant to law" 26includes statutory enactments and requirements established by   HB2746- 3 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this Act.2    (e) Prior to drawing a warrant, the Comptroller may review 3the voucher, any documentation accompanying the voucher, and 4any other documentation related to the transaction on file 5with him, and determine if the transaction is in accordance 6with the law. If based on his review the Comptroller has reason 7to believe that such transaction is not in accordance with the 8law, he shall refuse to draw a warrant.9    (f) Where the Comptroller refuses to draw a warrant 10pursuant to this Section, he shall maintain separate records 11of such transactions.12    (g) State agencies shall have the principal responsibility 13for the preaudit of their encumbrances, expenditures, and 14other transactions as otherwise required by law.15(Source: P.A. 103-266, eff. 1-1-24.) 16    (15 ILCS 405/9.03)  (from Ch. 15, par. 209.03)17    Sec. 9.03. Direct deposit of State payments. 18    (a) The Comptroller, with the approval of the State 19Treasurer, shall may provide by rule or regulation for the 20direct deposit of any payment lawfully payable from the State 21Treasury and in accordance with federal banking regulations 22including but not limited to payments to (i) persons paid from 23personal services, (ii) persons receiving benefit payments 24from the Comptroller under the State pension systems, (iii) 25individuals who receive assistance under Articles III, IV, and   HB2746- 4 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1VI of the Illinois Public Aid Code, (iv) providers of services 2under the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 3Administrative Act, (v) providers of community-based mental 4health services, and (vi) providers of services under programs 5administered by the State Board of Education, in the accounts 6of those persons or entities maintained at a bank, savings and 7loan association, or credit union, where authorized by the 8payee. The Comptroller also may deposit public aid payments 9for individuals who receive assistance under Articles III, IV, 10VI, and X of the Illinois Public Aid Code directly into an 11electronic benefits transfer account in a financial 12institution approved by the State Treasurer as prescribed by 13the Illinois Department of Human Services and in accordance 14with the rules and regulations of that Department and the 15rules and regulations adopted by the Comptroller and the State 16Treasurer. The Comptroller, with the approval of the State 17Treasurer, shall may provide by rule for the electronic direct 18deposit of payments to public agencies and any other payee of 19the State. The electronic direct deposits may be made to the 20designated account in those financial institutions specified 21in this Section for the direct deposit of payments. Within 6 22months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 231994, the Comptroller shall establish a pilot program for the 24electronic direct deposit of payments to local school 25districts, municipalities, and units of local government. The 26payments may be made without the use of the voucher-warrant   HB2746- 5 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1system, provided that documentation of approval by the 2Treasurer of each group of payments made by direct deposit 3shall be retained by the Comptroller. The form and method of 4the Treasurer's approval shall be established by the rules or 5regulations adopted by the Comptroller under this Section.6    (b) Except as provided in subsection (b-5), all State 7payments for an employee's payroll or an employee's expense 8reimbursement must be made through direct deposit. It is the 9responsibility of the paying State agency to ensure compliance 10with this mandate. If a State agency pays an employee's 11payroll or an employee's expense reimbursement without using 12direct deposit, the Comptroller may charge that employee a 13processing fee of $2.50 per paper warrant. The processing fee 14may be withheld from the employee's payment or reimbursement. 15The amount collected from the fee shall be deposited into the 16Comptroller's Administrative Fund.17    (b-5) If an employee wants his or her payments deposited 18into a secure check account, the employee must submit a direct 19deposit form to the paying State agency for his or her payroll 20or to the Comptroller for his or her expense reimbursements. 21Upon acceptance of the direct deposit form, the Comptroller 22shall disburse those funds to the secure check account. For 23the purposes of this Section, "secure check account" means an 24account established with a financial institution for the 25employee that allows the dispensing of the funds in the 26account through a third party who dispenses to the employee a   HB2746- 6 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1paper check. 2    (c) All State payments to a vendor that exceed the 3allowable limit of paper warrants in a fiscal year, by the same 4agency, must be made through direct deposit. It is the 5responsibility of the paying State agency to ensure compliance 6with this mandate. If a State agency pays a vendor more times 7than the allowable limit in a single fiscal year without using 8direct deposit, the Comptroller may charge the vendor a 9processing fee of $2.50 per paper warrant. The processing fee 10may be withheld from the vendor's payment. The amount 11collected from the processing fee shall be deposited into the 12Comptroller's Administrative Fund. The Office of the 13Comptroller shall define "allowable limit" in the 14Comptroller's Statewide Accounting Management System (SAMS) 15manual, except that the allowable limit shall not be less than 1630 paper warrants. The Office of the Comptroller shall also 17provide reasonable notice to all State agencies of the 18allowable limit of paper warrants.19    (c-1) All State payments to an entity from a payroll or 20retirement voluntary deduction must be made through direct 21deposit. If an entity receives a payment from a payroll or 22retirement voluntary deduction without using direct deposit, 23the Comptroller may charge the entity a processing fee of 24$2.50 per paper warrant. The processing fee may be withheld 25from the entity's payment or billed to the entity at a later 26date. The amount collected from the processing fee shall be   HB2746- 7 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1deposited into the Comptroller's Administrative Fund. The 2Comptroller shall provide reasonable notice to all entities 3impacted by this requirement. Any new entities that receive a 4payroll or retirement voluntary deduction must sign up for 5direct deposit during the application process. 6    (c-2) The detail information, such as names, identifiers, 7and amounts, associated with a State payment to an entity from 8a payroll or retirement voluntary deduction must be retrieved 9by the entity from the Comptroller's designated Internet 10website or an electronic alternative approved by the 11Comptroller. If the entity requires the Comptroller to mail 12the detail information, the Comptroller may charge the entity 13a processing fee up to $25.00 per mailing. Any processing fee 14will be billed to the entity at a later date. The amount 15collected from the processing fee shall be deposited into the 16Comptroller's Administrative Fund. The Comptroller shall 17provide reasonable notice to all entities impacted by this 18requirement. 19    (d) State employees covered by provisions in collective 20bargaining agreements that do not require direct deposit of 21paychecks are exempt from this mandate. No later than 60 days 22after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th 23General Assembly, all State agencies must provide to the 24Office of the Comptroller a list of employees that are exempt 25under this subsection (d) from the direct deposit mandate. In 26addition, a State employee or vendor may file a hardship   HB2746- 8 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1petition with the Office of the Comptroller requesting an 2exemption from the direct deposit mandate under this Section. 3A hardship petition shall be made available for download on 4the Comptroller's official Internet website. 5    (e) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 6the direct deposit of State payments under this Section for an 7employee's payroll, an employee's expense reimbursement, or a 8State vendor's payment does not authorize the State to 9automatically withdraw funds from those accounts.10    (f) For the purposes of this Section, "vendor" means a 11non-governmental entity with a taxpayer identification number 12issued by the Social Security Administration or Internal 13Revenue Service that receives payments through the 14Comptroller's commercial system. The term does not include 15State agencies.16    (g) The requirements of this Section do not apply to the 17legislative or judicial branches of State government. 18(Source: P.A. 97-348, eff. 8-12-11; 97-993, eff. 9-16-12; 1998-463, eff. 8-16-13; 98-1043, eff. 8-25-14.) 20    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 21Section 25 as follows: 22    (30 ILCS 105/25)  (from Ch. 127, par. 161)23    Sec. 25. Fiscal year limitations. 24    (a) All appropriations shall be available for expenditure   HB2746- 9 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1for the fiscal year or for a lesser period if the Act making 2that appropriation so specifies. A deficiency or emergency 3appropriation shall be available for expenditure only through 4June 30 of the year when the Act making that appropriation is 5enacted unless that Act otherwise provides.6    (b) Outstanding liabilities as of June 30, payable from 7appropriations which have otherwise expired, may be paid out 8of the expiring appropriations during the 3-month 2-month 9period ending at the close of business on September 30 August 1031. Any service involving professional or artistic skills or 11any personal services by an employee whose compensation is 12subject to income tax withholding must be performed as of June 1330 of the fiscal year in order to be considered an "outstanding 14liability as of June 30" that is thereby eligible for payment 15out of the expiring appropriation.16    (b-1) However, payment of tuition reimbursement claims 17under Section 14-7.03 or 18-3 of the School Code may be made by 18the State Board of Education from its appropriations for those 19respective purposes for any fiscal year, even though the 20claims reimbursed by the payment may be claims attributable to 21a prior fiscal year, and payments may be made at the direction 22of the State Superintendent of Education from the fund from 23which the appropriation is made without regard to any fiscal 24year limitations, except as required by subsection (j) of this 25Section. Beginning on June 30, 2021, payment of tuition 26reimbursement claims under Section 14-7.03 or 18-3 of the   HB2746- 10 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1School Code as of June 30, payable from appropriations that 2have otherwise expired, may be paid out of the expiring 3appropriation during the 4-month period ending at the close of 4business on October 31.5    (b-2) (Blank).6    (b-2.5) (Blank). 7    (b-2.6) (Blank). 8    (b-2.6a) (Blank). 9    (b-2.6b) (Blank). 10    (b-2.6c) (Blank). 11    (b-2.6d) All outstanding liabilities as of June 30, 2020, 12payable from appropriations that would otherwise expire at the 13conclusion of the lapse period for fiscal year 2020, and 14interest penalties payable on those liabilities under the 15State Prompt Payment Act, may be paid out of the expiring 16appropriations until December 31, 2020, without regard to the 17fiscal year in which the payment is made, as long as vouchers 18for the liabilities are received by the Comptroller no later 19than September 30, 2020. 20    (b-2.6e) All outstanding liabilities as of June 30, 2021, 21payable from appropriations that would otherwise expire at the 22conclusion of the lapse period for fiscal year 2021, and 23interest penalties payable on those liabilities under the 24State Prompt Payment Act, may be paid out of the expiring 25appropriations until September 30, 2021, without regard to the 26fiscal year in which the payment is made.   HB2746- 11 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    (b-2.7) For fiscal years 2012, 2013, 2014, 2018, and each 2fiscal year thereafter, interest penalties payable under the 3State Prompt Payment Act associated with a voucher for which 4payment is issued after June 30 may be paid out of the next 5fiscal year's appropriation. The future year appropriation 6must be for the same purpose and from the same fund as the 7original payment. An interest penalty voucher submitted 8against a future year appropriation must be submitted within 960 days after the issuance of the associated voucher, except 10that, for fiscal year 2018 only, an interest penalty voucher 11submitted against a future year appropriation must be 12submitted within 60 days of June 5, 2019 (the effective date of 13Public Act 101-10). The Comptroller must issue the interest 14payment within 60 days after acceptance of the interest 15voucher. 16    (b-3) Medical payments may be made by the Department of 17Veterans' Affairs from its appropriations for those purposes 18for any fiscal year, without regard to the fact that the 19medical services being compensated for by such payment may 20have been rendered in a prior fiscal year, except as required 21by subsection (j) of this Section. Beginning on June 30, 2021, 22medical payments payable from appropriations that have 23otherwise expired may be paid out of the expiring 24appropriation during the 4-month period ending at the close of 25business on October 31.26    (b-4) Medical payments and child care payments may be made   HB2746- 12 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1by the Department of Human Services (as successor to the 2Department of Public Aid) from appropriations for those 3purposes for any fiscal year, without regard to the fact that 4the medical or child care services being compensated for by 5such payment may have been rendered in a prior fiscal year; and 6payments may be made at the direction of the Department of 7Healthcare and Family Services (or successor agency) from the 8Health Insurance Reserve Fund without regard to any fiscal 9year limitations, except as required by subsection (j) of this 10Section. Beginning on June 30, 2021, medical and child care 11payments made by the Department of Human Services and payments 12made at the discretion of the Department of Healthcare and 13Family Services (or successor agency) from the Health 14Insurance Reserve Fund and payable from appropriations that 15have otherwise expired may be paid out of the expiring 16appropriation during the 4-month period ending at the close of 17business on October 31.18    (b-5) Medical payments may be made by the Department of 19Human Services from its appropriations relating to substance 20abuse treatment services for any fiscal year, without regard 21to the fact that the medical services being compensated for by 22such payment may have been rendered in a prior fiscal year, 23provided the payments are made on a fee-for-service basis 24consistent with requirements established for Medicaid 25reimbursement by the Department of Healthcare and Family 26Services, except as required by subsection (j) of this   HB2746- 13 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1Section. Beginning on June 30, 2021, medical payments made by 2the Department of Human Services relating to substance abuse 3treatment services payable from appropriations that have 4otherwise expired may be paid out of the expiring 5appropriation during the 4-month period ending at the close of 6business on October 31.7    (b-6) (Blank).8    (b-7) Payments may be made in accordance with a plan 9authorized by paragraph (11) or (12) of Section 405-105 of the 10Department of Central Management Services Law from 11appropriations for those payments without regard to fiscal 12year limitations. 13    (b-8) Reimbursements to eligible airport sponsors for the 14construction or upgrading of Automated Weather Observation 15Systems may be made by the Department of Transportation from 16appropriations for those purposes for any fiscal year, without 17regard to the fact that the qualification or obligation may 18have occurred in a prior fiscal year, provided that at the time 19the expenditure was made the project had been approved by the 20Department of Transportation prior to June 1, 2012 and, as a 21result of recent changes in federal funding formulas, can no 22longer receive federal reimbursement. 23    (b-9) (Blank). 24    (c) Further, payments may be made by the Department of 25Public Health and the Department of Human Services (acting as 26successor to the Department of Public Health under the   HB2746- 14 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1Department of Human Services Act) from their respective 2appropriations for grants for medical care to or on behalf of 3premature and high-mortality risk infants and their mothers 4and for grants for supplemental food supplies provided under 5the United States Department of Agriculture Women, Infants and 6Children Nutrition Program, for any fiscal year without regard 7to the fact that the services being compensated for by such 8payment may have been rendered in a prior fiscal year, except 9as required by subsection (j) of this Section. Beginning on 10June 30, 2021, payments made by the Department of Public 11Health and the Department of Human Services from their 12respective appropriations for grants for medical care to or on 13behalf of premature and high-mortality risk infants and their 14mothers and for grants for supplemental food supplies provided 15under the United States Department of Agriculture Women, 16Infants and Children Nutrition Program payable from 17appropriations that have otherwise expired may be paid out of 18the expiring appropriations during the 4-month period ending 19at the close of business on October 31.20    (d) The Department of Public Health and the Department of 21Human Services (acting as successor to the Department of 22Public Health under the Department of Human Services Act) 23shall each annually submit to the State Comptroller, Senate 24President, Senate Minority Leader, Speaker of the House, House 25Minority Leader, and the respective Chairmen and Minority 26Spokesmen of the Appropriations Committees of the Senate and   HB2746- 15 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1the House, on or before December 31, a report of fiscal year 2funds used to pay for services provided in any prior fiscal 3year. This report shall document by program or service 4category those expenditures from the most recently completed 5fiscal year used to pay for services provided in prior fiscal 6years.7    (e) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services, the 8Department of Human Services (acting as successor to the 9Department of Public Aid), and the Department of Human 10Services making fee-for-service payments relating to substance 11abuse treatment services provided during a previous fiscal 12year shall each annually submit to the State Comptroller, 13Senate President, Senate Minority Leader, Speaker of the 14House, House Minority Leader, the respective Chairmen and 15Minority Spokesmen of the Appropriations Committees of the 16Senate and the House, on or before November 30, a report that 17shall document by program or service category those 18expenditures from the most recently completed fiscal year used 19to pay for (i) services provided in prior fiscal years and (ii) 20services for which claims were received in prior fiscal years.21    (f) The Department of Human Services (as successor to the 22Department of Public Aid) shall annually submit to the State 23Comptroller, Senate President, Senate Minority Leader, Speaker 24of the House, House Minority Leader, and the respective 25Chairmen and Minority Spokesmen of the Appropriations 26Committees of the Senate and the House, on or before December   HB2746- 16 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b131, a report of fiscal year funds used to pay for services 2(other than medical care) provided in any prior fiscal year. 3This report shall document by program or service category 4those expenditures from the most recently completed fiscal 5year used to pay for services provided in prior fiscal years.6    (g) In addition, each annual report required to be 7submitted by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 8under subsection (e) shall include the following information 9with respect to the State's Medicaid program:10        (1) Explanations of the exact causes of the variance 11    between the previous year's estimated and actual 12    liabilities.13        (2) Factors affecting the Department of Healthcare and 14    Family Services' liabilities, including, but not limited 15    to, numbers of aid recipients, levels of medical service 16    utilization by aid recipients, and inflation in the cost 17    of medical services.18        (3) The results of the Department's efforts to combat 19    fraud and abuse.20    (h) As provided in Section 4 of the General Assembly 21Compensation Act, any utility bill for service provided to a 22General Assembly member's district office for a period 23including portions of 2 consecutive fiscal years may be paid 24from funds appropriated for such expenditure in either fiscal 25year.26    (i) An agency which administers a fund classified by the   HB2746- 17 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1Comptroller as an internal service fund may issue rules for:2        (1) billing user agencies in advance for payments or 3    authorized inter-fund transfers based on estimated charges 4    for goods or services;5        (2) issuing credits, refunding through inter-fund 6    transfers, or reducing future inter-fund transfers during 7    the subsequent fiscal year for all user agency payments or 8    authorized inter-fund transfers received during the prior 9    fiscal year which were in excess of the final amounts owed 10    by the user agency for that period; and11        (3) issuing catch-up billings to user agencies during 12    the subsequent fiscal year for amounts remaining due when 13    payments or authorized inter-fund transfers received from 14    the user agency during the prior fiscal year were less 15    than the total amount owed for that period.16User agencies are authorized to reimburse internal service 17funds for catch-up billings by vouchers drawn against their 18respective appropriations for the fiscal year in which the 19catch-up billing was issued or by increasing an authorized 20inter-fund transfer during the current fiscal year. For the 21purposes of this Act, "inter-fund transfers" means transfers 22without the use of the voucher-warrant process, as authorized 23by Section 9.01 of the State Comptroller Act.24    (i-1) Beginning on July 1, 2021, all outstanding 25liabilities, not payable during the 4-month lapse period as 26described in subsections (b-1), (b-3), (b-4), (b-5), and (c)   HB2746- 18 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1of this Section, that are made from appropriations for that 2purpose for any fiscal year, without regard to the fact that 3the services being compensated for by those payments may have 4been rendered in a prior fiscal year, are limited to only those 5claims that have been incurred but for which a proper bill or 6invoice as defined by the State Prompt Payment Act has not been 7received by September 30th following the end of the fiscal 8year in which the service was rendered. 9    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, the 10aggregate amount of payments to be made without regard for 11fiscal year limitations as contained in subsections (b-1), 12(b-3), (b-4), (b-5), and (c) of this Section, and determined 13by using Generally Accepted Accounting Principles, shall not 14exceed the following amounts: 15        (1) $6,000,000,000 for outstanding liabilities related 16    to fiscal year 2012; 17        (2) $5,300,000,000 for outstanding liabilities related 18    to fiscal year 2013; 19        (3) $4,600,000,000 for outstanding liabilities related 20    to fiscal year 2014; 21        (4) $4,000,000,000 for outstanding liabilities related 22    to fiscal year 2015; 23        (5) $3,300,000,000 for outstanding liabilities related 24    to fiscal year 2016; 25        (6) $2,600,000,000 for outstanding liabilities related 26    to fiscal year 2017;   HB2746- 19 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1        (7) $2,000,000,000 for outstanding liabilities related 2    to fiscal year 2018; 3        (8) $1,300,000,000 for outstanding liabilities related 4    to fiscal year 2019; 5        (9) $600,000,000 for outstanding liabilities related 6    to fiscal year 2020; and 7        (10) $0 for outstanding liabilities related to fiscal 8    year 2021 and fiscal years thereafter. 9    (k) Department of Healthcare and Family Services Medical 10Assistance Payments. 11        (1) Definition of Medical Assistance. 12            For purposes of this subsection, the term "Medical 13        Assistance" shall include, but not necessarily be 14        limited to, medical programs and services authorized 15        under Titles XIX and XXI of the Social Security Act, 16        the Illinois Public Aid Code, the Children's Health 17        Insurance Program Act, the Covering ALL KIDS Health 18        Insurance Act, the Long Term Acute Care Hospital 19        Quality Improvement Transfer Program Act, and medical 20        care to or on behalf of persons suffering from chronic 21        renal disease, persons suffering from hemophilia, and 22        victims of sexual assault. 23        (2) Limitations on Medical Assistance payments that 24    may be paid from future fiscal year appropriations. 25            (A) The maximum amounts of annual unpaid Medical 26        Assistance bills received and recorded by the   HB2746- 20 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1        Department of Healthcare and Family Services on or 2        before June 30th of a particular fiscal year 3        attributable in aggregate to the General Revenue Fund, 4        Healthcare Provider Relief Fund, Tobacco Settlement 5        Recovery Fund, Long-Term Care Provider Fund, and the 6        Drug Rebate Fund that may be paid in total by the 7        Department from future fiscal year Medical Assistance 8        appropriations to those funds are: $700,000,000 for 9        fiscal year 2013 and $100,000,000 for fiscal year 2014 10        and each fiscal year thereafter. 11            (B) Bills for Medical Assistance services rendered 12        in a particular fiscal year, but received and recorded 13        by the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 14        after June 30th of that fiscal year, may be paid from 15        either appropriations for that fiscal year or future 16        fiscal year appropriations for Medical Assistance. 17        Such payments shall not be subject to the requirements 18        of subparagraph (A). 19            (C) Medical Assistance bills received by the 20        Department of Healthcare and Family Services in a 21        particular fiscal year, but subject to payment amount 22        adjustments in a future fiscal year may be paid from a 23        future fiscal year's appropriation for Medical 24        Assistance. Such payments shall not be subject to the 25        requirements of subparagraph (A). 26            (D) Medical Assistance payments made by the   HB2746- 21 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1        Department of Healthcare and Family Services from 2        funds other than those specifically referenced in 3        subparagraph (A) may be made from appropriations for 4        those purposes for any fiscal year without regard to 5        the fact that the Medical Assistance services being 6        compensated for by such payment may have been rendered 7        in a prior fiscal year. Such payments shall not be 8        subject to the requirements of subparagraph (A). 9        (3) Extended lapse period for Department of Healthcare 10    and Family Services Medical Assistance payments. 11    Notwithstanding any other State law to the contrary, 12    outstanding Department of Healthcare and Family Services 13    Medical Assistance liabilities, as of June 30th, payable 14    from appropriations which have otherwise expired, may be 15    paid out of the expiring appropriations during the 4-month 16    period ending at the close of business on October 31st. 17    (l) The changes to this Section made by Public Act 97-691 18shall be effective for payment of Medical Assistance bills 19incurred in fiscal year 2013 and future fiscal years. The 20changes to this Section made by Public Act 97-691 shall not be 21applied to Medical Assistance bills incurred in fiscal year 222012 or prior fiscal years. 23    (m) The Comptroller must issue payments against 24outstanding liabilities that were received prior to the lapse 25period deadlines set forth in this Section as soon thereafter 26as practical, but no payment may be issued after the 4 months   HB2746- 22 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1following the lapse period deadline without the signed 2authorization of the Comptroller and the Governor or as 3provided by Section 18 of the Court of Claims Act. 4(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-291, eff. 8-6-21; 5102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-8, eff. 66-7-23.) 7    Section 15. The State Prompt Payment Act is amended by 8changing Sections 1, 3-2, 3-3, 3-6, 5, and 7 as follows: 9    (30 ILCS 540/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.401)10    Sec. 1. This Act applies to any State official or agency 11authorized to provide for payment from State funds, by virtue 12of any appropriation of the General Assembly, for goods or 13services furnished to the State.14    For purposes of this Act, "goods or services furnished to 15the State" include but are not limited to (i) covered health 16care provided to eligible members and their covered dependents 17in accordance with the State Employees Group Insurance Act of 181971, including coverage through a physician-owned health 19maintenance organization under Section 6.1 of that Act, (ii) 20prevention, intervention, or treatment services and supports 21for persons with developmental disabilities, mental health 22services, alcohol and substance abuse services, rehabilitation 23services, and early intervention services provided by a 24vendor, and (iii) prevention, intervention, or treatment   HB2746- 23 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1services and supports for youth provided by a vendor by virtue 2of a contractual grant agreement. For the purposes of items 3(ii) and (iii), a vendor includes but is not limited to sellers 4of goods and services, including community-based organizations 5that are licensed to provide prevention, intervention, or 6treatment services and supports for persons with developmental 7disabilities, mental illness, and substance abuse problems, or 8that provides prevention, intervention, or treatment services 9and supports for youth. 10    For the purposes of this Act, "appropriate State official 11or agency" is defined as the Director or Chief Executive or his 12designee of that State agency or department or facility of 13such agency or department. With respect to covered health care 14provided to eligible members and their dependents in 15accordance with the State Employees Group Insurance Act of 161971, "appropriate State official or agency" also includes an 17administrator of a program of health benefits under that Act.18    As used in this Act, "eligible member" means a member who 19is eligible for health benefits under the State Employees 20Group Insurance Act of 1971, and "member" and "dependent" have 21the meanings ascribed to those terms in that Act.22    As used in this Act, "a proper bill or invoice" means a 23bill or invoice, including, but not limited to, an invoice 24issued under a contractual grant agreement, that includes the 25information necessary for processing the payment as may be 26specified by a State agency and in rules adopted in accordance   HB2746- 24 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1with this Act. Beginning on and after July 1, 2021, "a proper 2bill or invoice" shall also include the names of all 3subcontractors or subconsultants to be paid from the bill or 4invoice and the amounts due to each of them, if any.5(Source: P.A. 100-549, eff. 1-1-18; 101-524, eff. 1-1-20.) 6    (30 ILCS 540/3-2)7    Sec. 3-2. Beginning July 1, 1993, in any instance where a 8State official or agency is late in payment of a vendor's bill 9or invoice for goods or services furnished to the State, as 10defined in Section 1, properly approved in accordance with 11rules promulgated under Section 3-3, the State official or 12agency shall pay interest to the vendor in accordance with the 13following:14        (1) (Blank). Any bill, except a bill submitted under 15    Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code and except as 16    provided under paragraph (1.05) of this Section, approved 17    for payment under this Section must be paid or the payment 18    issued to the payee within 60 days of receipt of a proper 19    bill or invoice. If payment is not issued to the payee 20    within this 60-day period, an interest penalty of 1.0% of 21    any amount approved and unpaid shall be added for each 22    month or fraction thereof after the end of this 60-day 23    period, until final payment is made. Any bill, except a 24    bill for pharmacy or nursing facility services or goods, 25    and except as provided under paragraph (1.05) of this   HB2746- 25 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    Section, submitted under Article V of the Illinois Public 2    Aid Code approved for payment under this Section must be 3    paid or the payment issued to the payee within 60 days 4    after receipt of a proper bill or invoice, and, if payment 5    is not issued to the payee within this 60-day period, an 6    interest penalty of 2.0% of any amount approved and unpaid 7    shall be added for each month or fraction thereof after 8    the end of this 60-day period, until final payment is 9    made. Any bill for pharmacy or nursing facility services 10    or goods submitted under Article V of the Illinois Public 11    Aid Code, except as provided under paragraph (1.05) of 12    this Section, and approved for payment under this Section 13    must be paid or the payment issued to the payee within 60 14    days of receipt of a proper bill or invoice. If payment is 15    not issued to the payee within this 60-day period, an 16    interest penalty of 1.0% of any amount approved and unpaid 17    shall be added for each month or fraction thereof after 18    the end of this 60-day period, until final payment is 19    made. 20        (1.05) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 21    Section, for For State fiscal years year 2012 through 2025 22    and future fiscal years, any bill approved for payment 23    under this Section must be paid or the payment issued to 24    the payee within 90 days of receipt of a proper bill or 25    invoice. If payment is not issued to the payee within this 26    90-day period, an interest penalty of 1.0% of any amount   HB2746- 26 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    approved and unpaid shall be added for each month, or 2    0.033% (one-thirtieth of one percent) of any amount 3    approved and unpaid for each day, after the end of this 4    90-day period, until final payment is made. 5        For State fiscal year 2026 and future fiscal years, 6    any bill approved for payment under this Section must be 7    paid or the payment issued to the payee within 60 days of 8    receipt of a proper bill or invoice. If payment is not 9    issued to the payee within this 60-day period, an interest 10    penalty of 1% of any amount approved and unpaid shall be 11    added for each month, or 0.033% (one-thirtieth of one 12    percent) of any amount approved and unpaid for each day, 13    after the end of this 60-day period, until final payment 14    is made. 15        (1.1) A State agency shall review in a timely manner 16    each bill or invoice within 30 days after its receipt. If 17    the State agency determines that the bill or invoice 18    contains a defect making it unable to process the payment 19    request, the agency shall notify the vendor requesting 20    payment as soon as possible after discovering the defect 21    pursuant to rules promulgated under Section 3-3; provided, 22    however, that the notice for construction related bills or 23    invoices must be given not later than 30 days after the 24    bill or invoice was first submitted. The notice shall 25    identify the defect and any additional information 26    necessary to correct the defect. If one or more items on a   HB2746- 27 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    construction related bill or invoice are disapproved, but 2    not the entire bill or invoice, then the portion that is 3    not disapproved shall be paid in accordance with the 4    requirements of this Act. 5        (2) Where a State official or agency is late in 6    payment of a vendor's bill or invoice properly approved in 7    accordance with this Act, and different late payment terms 8    are not reduced to writing as a contractual agreement, the 9    State official or agency shall automatically pay interest 10    penalties required by this Section amounting to $50 or 11    more to the appropriate vendor. Each agency shall be 12    responsible for determining whether an interest penalty is 13    owed and for paying the interest to the vendor. Except as 14    provided in paragraph (4), an individual interest payment 15    amounting to $5 or less shall not be paid by the State. 16    Interest due to a vendor that amounts to greater than $5 17    and less than $50 shall not be paid but shall be accrued 18    until all interest due the vendor for all similar warrants 19    exceeds $50, at which time the accrued interest shall be 20    payable and interest will begin accruing again, except 21    that interest accrued as of the end of the fiscal year that 22    does not exceed $50 shall be payable at that time. In the 23    event an individual has paid a vendor for services in 24    advance, the provisions of this Section shall apply until 25    payment is made to that individual.26        (3) The provisions of Public Act 96-1501 reducing the   HB2746- 28 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    interest rate on pharmacy claims under Article V of the 2    Illinois Public Aid Code to 1.0% per month shall apply to 3    any pharmacy bills for services and goods under Article V 4    of the Illinois Public Aid Code received on or after the 5    date 60 days before January 25, 2011 (the effective date 6    of Public Act 96-1501) except as provided under paragraph 7    (1.05) of this Section. 8        (4) Interest amounting to less than $5 shall not be 9    paid by the State, except for claims (i) to the Department 10    of Healthcare and Family Services or the Department of 11    Human Services, (ii) pursuant to Article V of the Illinois 12    Public Aid Code, the Covering ALL KIDS Health Insurance 13    Act, or the Children's Health Insurance Program Act, and 14    (iii) made (A) by pharmacies for prescriptive services or 15    (B) by any federally qualified health center for 16    prescriptive services or any other services.17    Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, interest 18may not be paid under this Act when: (1) a Chief Procurement 19Officer has voided the underlying contract for goods or 20services under Article 50 of the Illinois Procurement Code; or 21(2) the Auditor General is conducting a performance or program 22audit and the Comptroller has held or is holding for review a 23related contract or vouchers for payment of goods or services 24in the exercise of duties under Section 9 of the State 25Comptroller Act. In such event, interest shall not accrue 26during the pendency of the Auditor General's review.   HB2746- 29 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1(Source: P.A. 100-1064, eff. 8-24-18.) 2    (30 ILCS 540/3-3)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.403-3)3    Sec. 3-3. The State Comptroller and the Department of 4Central Management Services shall jointly promulgate rules and 5policies to govern the uniform application of this Act. These 6rules and policies shall include procedures and time frames 7for approving a bill or invoice from a vendor for goods or 8services furnished to the State. Those rules shall require 9that action to approve or reject a bill or invoice shall be 10taken not more than 30 days after receiving the bill or invoice 11from the vendor. These rules and policies shall provide for 12procedures and time frames applicable to payment plans as may 13be agreed upon between State agencies and vendors. These rules 14and policies shall be binding on all officials and agencies 15under this Act's jurisdiction. These rules and policies may be 16made effective no earlier than July 1, 1993.17(Source: P.A. 92-384, eff. 7-1-02.) 18    (30 ILCS 540/3-6)19    Sec. 3-6. Federal funds; lack of authority. If an agency 20incurs an interest liability under this Act that cannot be 21charged to the same expenditure authority account to which the 22related goods or services were charged due to federal 23prohibitions, the agency is authorized to pay the interest 24from its available appropriations from any funding source the   HB2746- 30 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1General Revenue Fund, except that the Department of 2Transportation is authorized to pay the interest from its 3available appropriations from the Road Fund, as long as the 4original goods or services were for purposes consistent with 5Section 11 of Article IX of the Illinois Constitution.6(Source: P.A. 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 7    (30 ILCS 540/5)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.405)8    Sec. 5. The State remittance and the grant agreement shall 9indicate that payment of interest may be available for failure 10to comply with this Act.11(Source: P.A. 92-384, eff. 7-1-02.) 12    (30 ILCS 540/7)  (from Ch. 127, par. 132.407)13    Sec. 7. Payments to subcontractors and material suppliers.14    (a) When a State official or agency responsible for 15administering a contract receives a bill or invoice from a 16contractor, that State official or agency shall confirm the 17date on which the bill or invoice was received within 5 18business days of receipt, and shall transmit any approved 19amount to the Comptroller within 30 days of receipt. 20    (a-1) When a State official or agency responsible for 21administering a contract submits a voucher to the Comptroller 22for payment to a contractor, that State official or agency 23shall promptly make available electronically the voucher 24number, the date of the voucher, and the amount of the voucher   HB2746- 31 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1within 5 business days of submitting the voucher to the 2Comptroller. The State official or agency responsible for 3administering the contract shall provide subcontractors and 4material suppliers, known to the State official or agency, 5with instructions on how to access the electronic information 6on the Comptroller's website.7    (a-5) When a contractor receives any payment, the 8contractor shall pay each subcontractor and material supplier 9electronically within 10 business days or 15 calendar days, 10whichever occurs earlier, or, if paid by a printed check, the 11printed check must be postmarked within 10 business days or 15 12calendar days, whichever occurs earlier, after receiving 13payment in proportion to the work completed by each 14subcontractor and material supplier its application or pay 15estimate, plus interest received under this Act. When a 16contractor receives any payment, the contractor shall pay each 17lower-tiered subcontractor and material supplier and each 18subcontractor and material supplier shall make payment to its 19own respective subcontractors and material suppliers. If the 20contractor receives less than the full payment due under the 21public construction contract, the contractor shall be 22obligated to disburse on a pro rata basis those funds 23received, plus interest received under this Act, with the 24contractor, subcontractors and material suppliers each 25receiving a prorated portion based on the amount of payment 26each has earned. When, however, the State official or agency   HB2746- 32 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1does not release the full payment due under the contract 2because there are specific areas of work or materials the 3State agency or official has determined are not suitable for 4payment, then those specific subcontractors or material 5suppliers involved shall not be paid for that portion of work 6rejected or deemed not suitable for payment and all other 7subcontractors and suppliers shall be paid based upon the 8amount of payment each has earned, plus interest received 9under this Act.10    (a-10) For construction contracts with the Department of 11Transportation, the contractor, subcontractor, or material 12supplier, regardless of tier, shall not offset, decrease, or 13diminish payment or payments that are due to its 14subcontractors or material suppliers without reasonable cause.15    A contractor, who refuses to make prompt payment within 10 16business days or 15 calendar days, whichever occurs earlier, 17after receiving payment, in whole or in part, shall provide to 18the subcontractor or material supplier and the public owner or 19its agent, a written notice of that refusal. The written 20notice shall be made by a contractor no later than 5 calendar 21days after payment is received by the contractor. The written 22notice shall identify the Department of Transportation's 23contract, any subcontract or material purchase agreement, a 24detailed reason for refusal, the value of the payment to be 25withheld, and the specific remedial actions required of the 26subcontractor or material supplier so that payment may be   HB2746- 33 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1made. Written notice of refusal may be given in a form and 2method which is acceptable to the parties and public owner.3    (b) If the contractor, without reasonable cause, fails to 4make full payment of amounts due under subsection (a) to its 5subcontractors and material suppliers within 10 business days 6or 15 calendar days, whichever occurs earlier, after receipt 7of payment from the State official or agency, the contractor 8shall pay to its subcontractors and material suppliers, in 9addition to the payment due them, interest in the amount of 2% 10per month, calculated from the expiration of the 1110-business-day period or the 15-calendar-day period until 12fully paid. This subsection shall further apply to any 13payments made by subcontractors and material suppliers to 14their subcontractors and material suppliers and to all 15payments made to lower tier subcontractors and material 16suppliers throughout the contracting chain.17        (1) If a contractor, without reasonable cause, fails 18    to make payment in full as provided in subsection (a-5) 19    within 10 business days or 15 calendar days, whichever 20    occurs earlier, after receipt of payment under the public 21    construction contract, any subcontractor or material 22    supplier to whom payments are owed may file a written 23    notice and request for administrative hearing with the 24    State official or agency setting forth the amount owed by 25    the contractor and the contractor's failure to timely pay 26    the amount owed. The written notice and request for   HB2746- 34 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    administrative hearing shall identify the public 2    construction contract, the contractor, and the amount 3    owed, and shall contain a sworn statement or attestation 4    to verify the accuracy of the notice. The notice and 5    request for administrative hearing shall be filed with the 6    State official for the public construction contract, with 7    a copy of the notice concurrently provided to the 8    contractor. Notice to the State official may be made by 9    certified or registered mail, messenger service, or 10    personal service, and must include proof of delivery to 11    the State official. 12        (2) The State official or agency, within 15 calendar 13    days after receipt of a subcontractor's or material 14    supplier's written notice and request for administrative 15    hearing, shall hold a hearing convened by an 16    administrative law judge to determine whether the 17    contractor withheld payment, without reasonable cause, 18    from the subcontractors or material suppliers and what 19    amount, if any, is due to the subcontractors or material 20    suppliers, and the reasonable cause or causes asserted by 21    the contractor. The State official or agency shall provide 22    appropriate notice to the parties of the date, time, and 23    location of the hearing. Each contractor, subcontractor, 24    or material supplier has the right to be represented by 25    counsel at a hearing and to cross-examine witnesses and 26    challenge documents. Upon the request of the subcontractor   HB2746- 35 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    or material supplier and a showing of good cause, 2    reasonable continuances may be granted by the 3    administrative law judge. 4        (3) Upon a finding by the administrative law judge 5    that the contractor failed to make payment in full, 6    without reasonable cause, as provided in subsection 7    (a-10), then the administrative law judge shall, in 8    writing, order the contractor to pay the amount owed to 9    the subcontractors or material suppliers plus interest 10    within 15 calendar days after the order.11        (4) If a contractor fails to make full payment as 12    ordered under paragraph (3) of this subsection (b) within 13    15 days after the administrative law judge's order, then 14    the contractor shall be barred from entering into a State 15    public construction contract for a period of one year 16    beginning on the date of the administrative law judge's 17    order.18        (5) If, on 2 or more occasions within a 19    3-calendar-year period, there is a finding by an 20    administrative law judge that the contractor failed to 21    make payment in full, without reasonable cause, and a 22    written order was issued to a contractor under paragraph 23    (3) of this subsection (b), then the contractor shall be 24    barred from entering into a State public construction 25    contract for a period of 6 months beginning on the date of 26    the administrative law judge's second written order, even   HB2746- 36 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    if the payments required under the orders were made in 2    full.3        (6) If a contractor fails to make full payment as 4    ordered under paragraph (4) of this subsection (b), the 5    subcontractor or material supplier may, within 30 days of 6    the date of that order, petition the State agency for an 7    order for reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred in 8    the prosecution of the action under this subsection (b). 9    Upon that petition and taking of additional evidence, as 10    may be required, the administrative law judge may issue a 11    supplemental order directing the contractor to pay those 12    reasonable attorney's fees and costs.13        (7) The written order of the administrative law judge 14    shall be final and appealable under the Administrative 15    Review Law.16    (b-5) On or before July 2021, the Department of 17Transportation shall publish on its website a searchable 18database that allows for queries for each active construction 19contract by the name of a subcontractor or the pay item such 20that each pay item is associated with either the prime 21contractor or a subcontractor. 22    (c) This Section shall not be construed to in any manner 23diminish, negate, or interfere with the 24contractor-subcontractor or contractor-material supplier 25relationship or commercially useful function.26    (d) This Section shall not preclude, bar, or stay the   HB2746- 37 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1rights, remedies, and defenses available to the parties by way 2of the operation of their contract, purchase agreement, the 3Mechanics Lien Act, or the Public Construction Bond Act.4    (e) State officials and agencies may adopt rules as may be 5deemed necessary in order to establish the formal procedures 6required under this Section.7    (f) As used in this Section:8    "Payment" means the discharge of an obligation in money or 9other valuable consideration or thing delivered in full or 10partial satisfaction of an obligation to pay. "Payment" shall 11include interest paid pursuant to this Act.12    "Reasonable cause" may include, but is not limited to, 13unsatisfactory workmanship or materials; failure to provide 14documentation required by the contract, subcontract, or 15material purchase agreement; claims made against the 16Department of Transportation or the subcontractor pursuant to 17subsection (c) of Section 23 of the Mechanics Lien Act or the 18Public Construction Bond Act; judgments, levies, garnishments, 19or other court-ordered assessments or offsets in favor of the 20Department of Transportation or other State agency entered 21against a subcontractor or material supplier. "Reasonable 22cause" does not include payments issued to the contractor that 23create a negative or reduced valuation pay application or pay 24estimate due to a reduction of contract quantities or work not 25performed or provided by the subcontractor or material 26supplier; the interception or withholding of funds for reasons   HB2746- 38 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1not related to the subcontractor's or material supplier's work 2on the contract; anticipated claims or assessments of third 3parties not a party related to the contract or subcontract; 4asserted claims or assessments of third parties that are not 5authorized by court order, administrative tribunal, or 6statute. "Reasonable cause" further does not include the 7withholding, offset, or reduction of payment, in whole or in 8part, due to the assessment of liquidated damages or penalties 9assessed by the Department of Transportation against the 10contractor, unless the subcontractor's performance or supplied 11materials were the sole and proximate cause of the liquidated 12damage or penalty. 13(Source: P.A. 100-43, eff. 8-9-17; 100-376, eff. 1-1-18; 14100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-524, eff. 1-1-20.) 15    Section 20. The Grant Accountability and Transparency Act 16is amended by changing Sections 30, 50, and 125 and by adding 17Section 135 as follows: 18    (30 ILCS 708/30)19    Sec. 30. Catalog of State Financial Assistance. The 20Catalog of State Financial Assistance is a single, 21authoritative, statewide, comprehensive source document of 22State financial assistance program information. The Catalog 23shall contain, at a minimum, the following information:24        (1) An introductory section that contains Catalog   HB2746- 39 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    highlights, an explanation of how to use the Catalog, an 2    explanation of the Catalog and its contents, and suggested 3    grant proposal writing methods and grant application 4    procedures.5        (2) A comprehensive indexing system that categorizes 6    programs by issuing agency, eligible applicant, 7    application deadlines, function, popular name, and subject 8    area.9        (3) Comprehensive appendices showing State assistance 10    programs that require coordination through this Act and 11    regulatory, legislative, and Executive Order authority for 12    each program, commonly used abbreviations and acronyms, 13    agency regional and local office addresses, and sources of 14    additional information.15        (4) A list of programs that have been added to or 16    deleted from the Catalog and the various program numbers 17    and title changes.18        (5) Program number, title, and popular name, if 19    applicable.20        (6) The name of the State department or agency or 21    independent agency and primary organization sub-unit 22    administering the program.23        (7) The enabling legislation, including popular name 24    of the Act, titles and Sections, Public Act number, and 25    citation to the Illinois Compiled Statutes.26        (8) The type or types of financial and nonfinancial   HB2746- 40 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    assistance offered by the program.2        (9) Uses and restrictions placed upon the program.3        (10) Eligibility requirements, including applicant 4    eligibility criteria, beneficiary eligibility criteria, 5    and required credentials and documentation.6        (11) Objectives and goals of the program.7        (12) Information regarding application and award 8    processing; application deadlines; range of approval or 9    disapproval time; appeal procedure; and availability of a 10    renewal or extension of assistance.11        (13) Assistance considerations, including an 12    explanation of the award formula, matching requirements, 13    and the length and time phasing of the assistance.14        (14) Post-assistance requirements, including any 15    reports, audits, and records that may be required.16        (15) Program accomplishments (where available) 17    describing quantitative measures of program performance.18        (16) Regulations, guidelines, and literature 19    containing citations to the Illinois Administrative Code, 20    the Code of Federal Regulations, and other pertinent 21    informational materials.22        (17) The names, telephone numbers, and e-mail 23    addresses of persons to be contacted for detailed program 24    information at the headquarters, regional, and local 25    levels. 26        (18) Criteria for Prompt Payment Act eligibility and   HB2746- 41 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    advanced payment eligibility. 2(Source: P.A. 98-706, eff. 7-16-14.) 3    (30 ILCS 708/50)4    Sec. 50. State grant-making agency responsibilities. 5    (a) The specific requirements and responsibilities of 6State grant-making agencies and non-federal entities are set 7forth in this Act. State agencies making State awards to 8non-federal entities must adopt by rule the language in 2 CFR 9200, Subpart C through Subpart F unless different provisions 10are required by law.11    (b) Each State grant-making agency shall appoint a Chief 12Accountability Officer who shall serve as a liaison to the 13Grant Accountability and Transparency Unit and who shall be 14responsible for the State agency's implementation of and 15compliance with the rules.16    (c) In order to effectively measure the performance of its 17recipients and subrecipients, each State grant-making agency 18shall: 19        (1) require its recipients and subrecipients to relate 20    financial data to performance accomplishments of the award 21    and, when applicable, must require recipients and 22    subrecipients to provide cost information to demonstrate 23    cost-effective practices. The recipient's and 24    subrecipient's performance should be measured in a way 25    that will help the State agency to improve program   HB2746- 42 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    outcomes, share lessons learned, and spread the adoption 2    of promising practices; and 3        (2) provide recipients and subrecipients with clear 4    performance goals, indicators, and milestones and must 5    establish performance reporting frequency and content to 6    not only allow the State agency to understand the 7    recipient's progress, but also to facilitate 8    identification of promising practices among recipients and 9    subrecipients and build the evidence upon which the State 10    agency's program and performance decisions are made. The 11    frequency of reports on performance goals, indicators, and 12    milestones required under this Section shall not be more 13    frequent than quarterly. Nothing in this Section is 14    intended to prohibit more frequent reporting to assess 15    items such as service needs, gaps, or capacity, as 16    indicated by a corrective action plan or by a risk 17    assessment.18    (c-5) Each State grant-making agency shall, when it is in 19the best interests of the State, request that the Office of the 20Comptroller issue a stop payment order in accordance with 21Section 105 of this Act. 22    (c-6) Upon notification by the Grant Transparency and 23Accountability Unit that a stop payment order has been 24requested by a State grant-making agency, each State 25grant-making agency who has issued a grant to that recipient 26or subrecipient shall determine if it remains in the best   HB2746- 43 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1interests of the State to continue to issue payments to the 2recipient or subrecipient. 3    (d) The Governor's Office of Management and Budget shall 4provide such advice and technical assistance to the State 5grant-making agencies as is necessary or indicated in order to 6ensure compliance with this Act. Advice and technical 7assistance to State grant-making agencies shall include: 8        (1) training for State agency staff about the criteria 9    for Prompt Payment Act eligibility and advanced payment 10    eligibility;11        (2) best practices for disseminating information about 12    grant opportunities statewide, with an emphasis on 13    reaching previously underserved communities and new 14    vendors, and15        (3) the Court of Claims' jurisdiction and process 16    under the Court of Claims Act. 17    (e) In accordance with this Act and the Illinois State 18Collection Act of 1986, refunds required under the Grant Funds 19Recovery Act may be referred to the Comptroller's offset 20system. 21(Source: P.A. 100-997, eff. 8-20-18.) 22    (30 ILCS 708/125)23    Sec. 125. Expenditures prior to grant execution; reporting 24requirements.25    (a) In the event that a recipient or subrecipient incurs   HB2746- 44 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1expenses related to the grant award prior to the execution of 2the grant agreement but within the term of the grant, and the 3grant agreement is executed more than 30 days after the 4effective date of the grant, the recipient or subrecipient 5must submit to the State grant-making agency a report that 6accounts for eligible grant expenditures and project 7activities from the effective date of the grant up to and 8including the date of execution of the grant agreement. If the 9State grant-making agency does not issue the grant agreement 10to the recipient within 60 days of the effective date of the 11grant, interest penalties shall apply pursuant to Section 3-4 12of the State Prompt Payment Act. 13    (b) The recipient or subrecipient must submit the report 14to the State grant-making agency within 30 days of execution 15of the grant agreement.16    (c) Only those expenses that are reasonable, allowable, 17and in furtherance of the purpose of the grant award shall be 18reimbursed.19    (d) The State grant-making agency must approve the report 20prior to issuing any payment to the recipient or subrecipient. 21(Source: P.A. 100-997, eff. 8-20-18.) 22    (30 ILCS 708/135 new)23    Sec. 135. Grant Agreement specifications. 24    (a) A grant agreement shall include:25        (1) the dates on which the State grant-making agency   HB2746- 45 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    will transmit vouchers to the Comptroller; and2        (2) whether the grant is eligible under the Prompt 3    Payment Act or for advanced payments.4    (b) A State agency shall not restrict the amount of money 5used to pay for fringe benefits.6    (c) A State agency shall not restrict indirect costs to 7less than 20% of the grant agreement or the federally 8negotiated rate, whichever is higher, unless the recipient 9prefers a lower rate.10    (d) A State agency shall not restrict direct 11administrative costs to less than 20% of direct costs in the 12grant agreement unless the recipient prefers a lower rate.13    (e) Nothing in this Section shall apply to grants that are 14solely for the purpose of capital projects.15    (f) Nothing in this Section shall apply if the grant 16conflicts with requirements due to federal law or federal 17grant obligations. 18    Section 25. The Court of Claims Act is amended by changing 19Sections 6, 9, 10, 11, 13, 16, 19, 21, 22, 23, and 24 and by 20adding Section 8.1 as follows: 21    (705 ILCS 505/6)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.6)22    Sec. 6. The court shall hold sessions at such places as it 23deems necessary to expedite the business of the court and may 24hold sessions in person or remotely. The court may adopt   HB2746- 46 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1administrative rules to provide for remote participation and 2electronic filing in any proceeding and for the conduct of any 3business of the court.4(Source: P.A. 90-492, eff. 8-17-97.) 5    (705 ILCS 505/8.1 new)6    Sec. 8.1. Confirmation of claims. The court must confirm 7receipt of claim to the vendor within 30 days for all claims 8arising under paragraph (b) of Section 8 of this Act. The State 9agency must confirm or reject all claims arising under 10paragraph (b) of Section 8 of this Act within 30 days after 11being contacted by the Attorney General. If the State agency 12does not confirm or reject a claim within 30 days, the State 13agency forfeits the right to reject or contest the claim. The 14Comptroller must issue payment to vendors within 30 days of 15the court entering an award for claims arising under paragraph 16(b) of Section 8 of this Act, subject to available 17appropriation. 18    (705 ILCS 505/9)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.9)19    Sec. 9. Court powers and duties. The court may: 20    (a) The court may establish A. Establish rules for its 21government and for the regulation of practice therein; appoint 22commissioners to assist the court in such manner as it directs 23and discharge them at will; and exercise such powers as are 24necessary to carry into effect the powers granted in this   HB2746- 47 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1Section. Any Commissioner appointed shall be an attorney 2licensed to practice law in the State of Illinois. The rules 3established hereunder shall not be waived, and any extension 4of time authorized by such rules shall only be allowed on 5motion duly filed within the time limitation for which the 6extension is requested.7    (b) The court may issue B. Issue subpoenas through the 8Chief Justice or one of its judges or commissioners to require 9the attendance of witnesses for the purpose of testifying 10before it, or before any judge of the court, or before any 11notary public, or any of its commissioners, and to require the 12production of any books, records, papers or documents that may 13be material or relevant as evidence in any matter pending 14before it. In case any person refuses to comply with any 15subpoena issued in the name of the chief justice, or one of the 16judges or commissioners, attested by the clerk, with the seal 17of the court attached, and served upon the person named 18therein as a summons in a civil action is served, the circuit 19court of the proper county, on application of the party at 20whose instance the subpoena was issued, shall compel obedience 21by attachment proceedings, as for contempt, as in a case of a 22disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena from such court 23on a refusal to testify therein.24    (c) The court shall create an online portal that allows 25vendors to submit claims electronically under subsection (b) 26of Section 8 of this Act, and to view and track the status of   HB2746- 48 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1their claim and any related documentation. 2    (d) If the court determines that it is unable to process a 3claim because the bill or invoice contains a defect, the court 4shall notify the vendor requesting payment not later than 30 5days after the bill or invoice was first submitted. The notice 6shall identify the defect and any additional information 7necessary to correct the defect. If one or more items on a bill 8or invoice are disapproved, but not the entire bill or 9invoice, then the portion that is not disapproved shall be 10paid. For disapproved portions of a claim, the court shall 11allow claimants to electronically submit documentation to 12amend and cure defects through the online portal created by 13this Act within 30 days after receipt of notice of denied 14claim. 15(Source: P.A. 83-865.) 16    (705 ILCS 505/10)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.10)17    Sec. 10. (a) The judges, commissioners and the clerk of 18the court may administer oaths and affirmations, take 19acknowledgments of instruments in writing, and give 20certificates of them.21    (b) The clerk of the court may administratively determine 22certain claims against the State if the claim possesses all of 23the following characteristics:24        (1) The claim does not arise under an appropriation 25    for the current fiscal year.  HB2746- 49 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1        (2) The State agency concerned concurs in the claim.2        (3) The amount claimed does not exceed $2,500.3        (4) The claim has been approved by the Attorney 4    General as one that, in view of the purposes of this Act, 5    should be paid.6    The State agency concerned shall prepare the record of the 7claim consisting of all papers, stipulations, and evidential 8documents required by the rules of the court and file the same 9with the clerk. The clerk shall consider the claim informally 10upon the record submitted. If the clerk determines that the 11claim should be entered as an approved claim and an award made, 12the clerk shall so order and shall file a statement with the 13court. If the clerk finds that the record is inadequate, or 14that the claim should not be paid, the clerk shall reject the 15claim. The rejection of a claim under this Section does not bar 16its resubmission under the regular procedure. 17    (c) The judges, commissioners, and the clerk of the court 18may conduct any activity of the court remotely.19    (d) The Court of Claims may adopt administrative rules to 20implement this Section. 21(Source: Laws 1945, p. 660.) 22    (705 ILCS 505/11)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.11)23    Sec. 11. Filing claims.24    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this 25Section and subsection (4) of Section 24, the claimant shall   HB2746- 50 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1in all cases set forth fully in his petition the claim, the 2action thereon, if any, on behalf of the State, what persons 3are owners or trustees as defined under Section 3 of the 4Charitable Trust Act thereof or interested therein, when and 5upon what consideration such persons became so interested; 6that no assignment or transfer of the claim or any part thereof 7or interest therein has been made, except as stated in the 8petition; that the claimant is justly entitled to the amount 9therein claimed from the State of Illinois, after allowing all 10just credits; and that claimant believes the facts stated in 11the petition to be true. The petition shall be verified, as to 12statements of facts, by the affidavit of the claimant, his 13agent, or attorney. 14    (b) Whenever a person has served a term of imprisonment 15and has received a pardon by the Governor stating that such 16pardon was issued on the ground of innocence of the crime for 17which he or she was imprisoned, the Prisoner Review Board 18shall transmit this information to the clerk of the Court of 19Claims, together with the claimant's current address. Whenever 20a person has served a term of imprisonment and has received a 21certificate of innocence from the Circuit Court as provided in 22Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the clerk of the 23issuing Circuit Court shall transmit this information to the 24clerk of the Court of Claims, together with the claimant's 25current address. The clerk of the Court of Claims shall 26immediately docket the case for consideration by the Court of   HB2746- 51 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1Claims, and shall provide notice to the claimant of such 2docketing together with all hearing dates and applicable 3deadlines. The Court of Claims shall hear the case and render a 4decision within 90 days after its docketing. 5(Source: P.A. 95-970, eff. 9-22-08; 96-328, eff. 8-11-09.) 6    (705 ILCS 505/13)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.13)7    Sec. 13. Evidence. Any judge or commissioner of the court 8may sit at any place within the State to take evidence in any 9case in the court. Any judge or commissioner may take evidence 10remotely. 11(Source: Laws 1945, p. 660.) 12    (705 ILCS 505/16)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.16)13    Sec. 16. Concurrence of judges. Concurrence of 4 judges is 14necessary to the decision of any case; provided, however, the 15court in its discretion may assign any case to a commissioner 16for hearing and final decision, subject to whatever right of 17review the court by rule may choose to exercise. In matters 18involving claims made with respect to lapsed appropriations or 19the award of emergency funds under the Crime Victims 20Compensation Act, the decision of only one judge is necessary 21to award emergency funds.22(Source: P.A. 92-286, eff. 1-1-02.) 23    (705 ILCS 505/19)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.19)  HB2746- 52 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    Sec. 19. The Attorney General, or his assistants under his 2direction, shall appear for the defense and protection of the 3interests of the State of Illinois in all cases filed in the 4court, and may make claim for recoupment by the State.5    For all claims arising under paragraph (b) of Section 8 of 6this Act:7        (1) the Attorney General must confirm receipt of the 8    claim to the claimant and contact the State agency within 9    5 days of receiving the claim from the court to confirm or 10    reject the veracity of the claim.11        (2) the State agency must confirm or reject the 12    veracity of the claim with the Attorney General's office 13    within 45 days of being contacted by the Attorney General.14        (3) The Attorney General must notify the claimant of 15    the State agency's decision and file a stipulation or 16    motion with the Court within 30 days of the State agency 17    confirming or rejecting the claim. 18(Source: Laws 1945, p. 660.) 19    (705 ILCS 505/21)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.21)20    Sec. 21. The court is authorized to impose, by uniform 21rules, a fee of $15 for the filing of a petition in any case in 22which the award sought is more than $500 $50 and less than 23$10,000 $1,000 and $35 in any case in which the award sought is 24$10,000 $1,000 or more; and to charge and collect for copies of 25opinions or other documents filed in the Court of Claims such   HB2746- 53 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1fees as may be prescribed by the rules of the Court. All fees 2and charges so collected shall be forthwith paid into the 3State Treasury. For claims arising from paragraph (b) of 4Section 8 of this Act, when the Court rules in favor of the 5vendor, the filing fee shall be refunded to the claimant. The 6court may determine the form and manner of all filing fees and 7other charges due the court by rule. 8    A petitioner who is a prisoner in an Illinois Department 9of Corrections facility who files a pleading, motion, or other 10filing that purports to be a legal document against the State, 11the Illinois Department of Corrections, the Prisoner Review 12Board, or any of their officers or employees in which the court 13makes a specific finding that it is frivolous shall pay all 14filing fees and court costs in the manner provided in Article 15XXII of the Code of Civil Procedure.16    In claims based upon lapsed appropriations or lost warrant 17or in claims filed under the Line of Duty Compensation Act, the 18Illinois National Guardsman's Compensation Act, or the Crime 19Victims Compensation Act or in claims filed by medical vendors 20for medical services rendered by the claimant to persons 21eligible for Medical Assistance under programs administered by 22the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, no filing 23fee shall be required.24(Source: P.A. 95-331, eff. 8-21-07.) 25    (705 ILCS 505/23)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.23)  HB2746- 54 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    Sec. 23. Notwithstanding the exceptions for lapsed 2appropriations as stipulated by subsection (b) of Section 8 of 3this Act, it It is the policy of the General Assembly to make 4no appropriation to pay any claim against the State, 5cognizable by the court, unless an award therefor has been 6made by the court.7(Source: Laws 1945, p. 660.) 8    (705 ILCS 505/24)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.24)9    Sec. 24. Payment of awards. 10    (1) From funds appropriated by the General Assembly for 11the purposes of this Section the Court may direct immediate 12payment of:13        (a) All claims arising solely as a result of the 14    lapsing of an appropriation out of which the obligation 15    could have been paid.16        (b) All claims pursuant to the Line of Duty 17    Compensation Act.18        (c) All claims pursuant to the "Illinois National 19    Guardsman's and Naval Militiaman's Compensation Act", 20    approved August 12, 1971, as amended.21        (d) All claims pursuant to the "Crime Victims 22    Compensation Act", approved August 23, 1973, as amended.23        (d-5) All claims against the State for unjust 24    imprisonment as provided in subsection (c) of Section 8 of 25    this Act.   HB2746- 55 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1        (e) All other claims wherein the amount of the award 2    of the Court is less than $50,000.3    (2) The court may, from funds specifically appropriated 4from the General Revenue Fund for this purpose, direct the 5payment of awards less than $100,000 $50,000 solely as a 6result of the lapsing of an appropriation originally made from 7any fund held by the State Treasurer. For any such award paid 8from the General Revenue Fund, the court shall thereafter seek 9an appropriation from the fund from which the liability 10originally accrued in reimbursement of the General Revenue 11Fund. 12    (3) In directing payment of a claim pursuant to the Line of 13Duty Compensation Act, the Court must direct the Comptroller 14to add an interest penalty if payment of a claim is not made 15within 6 months after a claim is filed in accordance with 16Section 3 of the Line of Duty Compensation Act and all 17information has been submitted as required under Section 4 of 18the Line of Duty Compensation Act. If payment is not issued 19within the 6-month period, an interest penalty of 1% of the 20amount of the award shall be added for each month or fraction 21thereof after the end of the 6-month period, until final 22payment is made. This interest penalty shall be added 23regardless of whether the payment is not issued within the 246-month period because of the appropriation process, the 25consideration of the matter by the Court, or any other reason. 26    (3.5) The interest penalty payment provided for in   HB2746- 56 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1subsection (3) shall be added to all claims for which benefits 2were not paid as of the effective date of P.A. 95-928. The 3interest penalty shall be calculated starting from the 4effective date of P.A. 95-928, provided that the effective 5date of P.A. 95-928 is at least 6 months after the date on 6which the claim was filed in accordance with Section 3 of the 7Line of Duty Compensation Act. In the event that the date 6 8months after the date on which the claim was filed is later 9than the effective date of P.A. 95-928, the Court shall 10calculate the interest payment penalty starting from the date 116 months after the date on which the claim was filed in 12accordance with Section 3 of the Line of Duty Compensation 13Act. This subsection (3.5) of this amendatory Act of the 96th 14General Assembly is declarative of existing law. 15    (3.6) In addition to the interest payments provided for in 16subsections (3) and (3.5), the Court shall direct the 17Comptroller to add a "catch-up" payment to the claims of 18eligible claimants. For the purposes of this subsection (3.6), 19an "eligible claimant" is a claimant whose claim is not paid in 20the year in which it was filed. For purposes of this subsection 21(3.6), "'catch-up' payment" is defined as the difference 22between the amount paid to claimants whose claims were filed 23in the year in which the eligible claimant's claim is paid and 24the amount paid to claimants whose claims were filed in the 25year in which the eligible claimant filed his or her claim. The 26"catch-up" payment is payable simultaneously with the claim   HB2746- 57 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1award. 2    (4) From funds appropriated by the General Assembly for 3the purposes of paying claims under paragraph (c) of Section 48, the court must direct payment of each claim and the payment 5must be received by the claimant within 60 days after the date 6that the funds are appropriated for that purpose. 7(Source: P.A. 100-1124, eff. 11-27-18.)  HB2746- 58 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    15 ILCS 405/9from Ch. 15, par. 2094    15 ILCS 405/9.03from Ch. 15, par. 209.035    30 ILCS 105/25from Ch. 127, par. 1616    30 ILCS 540/1from Ch. 127, par. 132.4017    30 ILCS 540/3-28    30 ILCS 540/3-3from Ch. 127, par. 132.403-39    30 ILCS 540/3-610    30 ILCS 540/5from Ch. 127, par. 132.40511    30 ILCS 540/7from Ch. 127, par. 132.40712    30 ILCS 708/3013    30 ILCS 708/5014    30 ILCS 708/12515    30 ILCS 708/135 new16    705 ILCS 505/6from Ch. 37, par. 439.617    705 ILCS 505/8.1 new18    705 ILCS 505/9from Ch. 37, par. 439.919    705 ILCS 505/10from Ch. 37, par. 439.1020    705 ILCS 505/11from Ch. 37, par. 439.1121    705 ILCS 505/13from Ch. 37, par. 439.1322    705 ILCS 505/16from Ch. 37, par. 439.1623    705 ILCS 505/19from Ch. 37, par. 439.1924    705 ILCS 505/21from Ch. 37, par. 439.2125    705 ILCS 505/23from Ch. 37, par. 439.23  HB2746- 59 -LRB104 10669 HLH 20748 b1    705 ILCS 505/24from Ch. 37, par. 439.24